vi: Loại sợi tương thích: Alpaca; Angora; Thỏ Angora; Viscose/rayon tre; Pha; Cashmere; Cotton; Lanh; Gai dầu; Lanh/gai; Llama; Mohair; Lụa; Sợi tổng hợp (acrylic/polyester); Sợi tổng hợp; Len; Yak; Khác
tr: Uyumlu fiber tipi: Alpaka; Angora; Angora tavşanı; Bambu viskoz/rayon; Karışımlar; Kaşmir; Pamuk; Keten; Kenevir; Keten; Lama; Tiftik; İpek; Sentetik (akrilik/polyester); Sentetik lifler; Yün; Yak; Diğer
zh-CN: 适用纤维类型: 羊驼毛; 安哥拉毛; 安哥拉兔毛; 竹粘胶/人造丝; 混纺; 羊绒; 棉; 亚麻; 汉麻; 亚麻; 大羊驼毛; 马海毛; 丝绸; 合成纤维（腈纶/涤纶）; 合成纤维; 羊毛; 牦牛绒; 其他
fr: Type de fibre compatible: Alpaga; Angora; Lapin angora; Viscose/rayonne de bambou; Mélanges; Cachemire; Coton; Lin; Chanvre; Lin; Lama; Mohair; Soie; Synthétique (acrylique/polyester); Fibres synthétiques; Laine; Yack; Autre
sv: Kompatibel fibertyp: Alpacka; Angora; Angorakanin; Bambuviskos/rayon; Blandningar; Kaschmir; Bomull; Lin/linne; Hampa; Linne/lin; Lama; Mohair; Silke; Syntetisk (akryl/polyester); Syntetfibrer; Ull; Jak; Annat
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta vlakna: Alpaka; Angora; Angorski zec; Viskoza/rajon od bambusa; Mješavine; Kašmir; Pamuk; Lan; Konoplja; Lan; Ljama; Moher; Svila; Sintetika (akril/poliester); Sintetička vlakna; Vuna; Jak; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de fibra compatível: Alpaca; Angorá; Coelho de Angorá; Viscose de bambu/rayon; Misturas; Caxemira; Algodão; Linho; Cânhamo; Linho; Lhama; Mohair; Seda; Sintética (acrílico/poléster); Fibras sintéticas; Lã; Iaque; Outra
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ vlákna: Alpaka; Angora; Angorský králik; Bambusová viskóza/rayon; Zmesi; Kašmír; Bavlna; Ľan; Konope; Ľan; Lama; Mohér; Hodváb; Syntetika (akryl/polyester); Syntetické vlákna; Vlna; Jak; Iné
it: Tipo di fibra compatibile: Alpaca; Angora; Coniglio d'angora; Viscosa di bambù/rayon; Misti; Cashmere; Cotone; Lino; Canapa; Lino; Lama; Mohair; Seta; Sintetica (acrilico/poliestere); Fibre sintetiche; Lana; Yak; Altro
ru: Совместимый тип волокна: Альпака; Ангора; Ангорский кролик; Бамбуковая вискоза / вискоза; Смеси; Кашемир; Хлопок; Лён; Конопля; Лён; Лама; Мохер; Шёлк; Синтетика (акрил/полиэстер); Синтетические волокна; Шерсть; Як; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de fibra compatível: Alpaca; Angorá; Coelho angorá; Viscose de bambu/rayon; Misturas; Cashmere; Algodão; Linho; Cânhamo; Linho; Lhama; Mohair; Seda; Sintética (acrílico/poliéster); Fibras sintéticas; Lã; Iaque; Outro
nl: Compatibel vezeltype: Alpaca; Angora; Angorakonijn; Bamboe-viscose/rayon; Melanges; Kasjmier; Katoen; Vlas/linnen; Hennep; Linnen/vlas; Lama; Mohair; Zijde; Synthetisch (acryl/polyester); Synthetische vezels; Wol; Jak; Overig
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta vlaknine: Alpaka; Angora; Angorski zajec; Bambusova viskoza/rajon; Mešanice; Kašmir; Bombaž; Lan; Konoplja; Lan; Lama; Moher; Svila; Sintetika (akril/poliester); Sintetična vlakna; Volna; Jak; Drugo
hu: Kompatibilis rost típusa: Alpaka; Angóra; Angóranyúl; Bambusz viszkóz / műselyem; Keverékek; Kasmír; Pamut; Len / lenvászon; Kender; Lenvászon / len; Láma; Moher; Selyem; Szintetikus (akril / poliészter); Szintetikus szálak; Gyapjú; Jak; Egyéb
th: ประเภทเส้นใยที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: อัลปาก้า; แองโกรา; กระต่ายแองโกรา; วิสคอส/เรยอนจากไผ่; เส้นใยผสม; แคชเมียร์; ฝ้าย; แฟลกซ์/ลินิน; ใยกัญชง; ลินิน/แฟลกซ์; ลามะ; โมแฮร์; ไหม; ใยสังเคราะห์ (อะคริลิก/โพลีเอสเตอร์); เส้นใยสังเคราะห์; ขนสัตว์; จามรี; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel fibertype: Alpaka; Angora; Angorakanin; Bambusviskose/rayon; Blandinger; Kashmir; Bomuld; Hør/linned; Hamp; Linned/hør; Lama; Mohair; Silke; Syntetisk (akryl/polyester); Syntetiske fibre; Uld; Yak; Andet
de: Kompatibler Fasertyp: Alpaka; Angora; Angorakaninchen; Bambusviskose/Rayon; Mischgewebe; Kaschmir; Baumwolle; Flachs/Leinen; Hanf; Leinen/Flachs; Lama; Mohair; Seide; Synthetik (Acryl/Polyester); Synthetikfasern; Wolle; Yak; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo pluoštas: Alpaka; Angora; Angoros triušių vilna; Bambuko viskozė / dirbtinis šilkas; Mišiniai; Kašmyras; Medvilnė; Linas; Kanapės; Linas; Lamos vilna; Mohera; Šilkas; Sintetika (akrilas / poliesteris); Sintetiniai pluoštai; Vilna; Jako vilna; Kita
nb: Kompatibel fibertype: Alpakka; Angora; Angorakanin; Bambusviskose/rayon; Blandinger; Kasjmir; Bomull; Lin; Hamp; Lin; Lama; Mohair; Silke; Syntetisk (akryl/polyester); Syntetiske fibre; Ull; Jak; Annet
fi: Yhteensopiva kuitutyyppi: Alpakka; Angora; Angorakani; Bambuviskoosi/raion; Sekoitteet; Kashmir; Puuvilla; Pellava; Hamppu; Pellava; Laama; Mohair; Silkki; Synteettinen (akryyli/polyesteri); Synteettiset kuidut; Villa; Jakki; Muu
es: Tipo de fibra compatible: Alpaca; Angora; Conejo de angora; Viscosa de bambú/rayón; Mezclas; Cachemira; Algodón; Lino; Cáñamo; Lino; Llama; Mohair; Seda; Sintética (acrílico/poliéster); Fibras sintéticas; Lana; Yak; Otra
ja: 対応ファイバータイプ: アルパカ; アンゴラ; アンゴラウサギ; 竹ビスコース / レーヨン; ブレンド; カシミヤ; コットン; 亜麻 / リネン; ヘンプ; リネン / 亜麻; リャマ; モヘア; シルク; 合成繊維 (アクリル / ポリエステル); 合成繊維; ウール; ヤク; その他
cs: Kompatibilní typ optického vlákna: Alpaka; Angora; Angorský králík; Bambusová viskóza / rayon; Směsi; Kašmír; Bavlna; Len; Konopí; Len; Lama; Mohér; Hedvábí; Syntetika (akryl/polyester); Syntetická vlákna; Vlna; Jak; Jiné
pl: Zgodny typ włókien: Alpaka; Angora; Królik angorski; Wiskoza/sztuczny jedwab z bambusa; Mieszanki; Kaszmir; Bawełna; Len; Konopie; Len; Lama; Moher; Jedwab; Syntetyk (akryl/poliester); Włókna syntetyczne; Wełna; Jak; Inne
el: Συμβατός τύπος ίνας: Αλπακά; Ανγκορά; Κουνέλι ανγκορά; Βισκόζη μπαμπού/ρεγιόν; Μείγματα; Κασμίρ; Βαμβάκι; Λινάρι/λινό; Κάνναβη; Λινό/λινάρι; Λάμα; Μοχέρ; Μετάξι; Συνθετικό (ακρυλικό/πολυεστέρας); Συνθετικές ίνες; Μαλλί; Γιακ; Άλλο
en: Compatible fiber type: Alpaca; Angora; Angora rabbit; Bamboo viscose/rayon; Blends; Cashmere; Cotton; Flax/Linen; Hemp; Linen/flax; Llama; Mohair; Silk; Synthetic (acrylic/polyester); Synthetic fibers; Wool; Yak; Other
bg-BG: Съвместим тип влакна: Алпака; Ангора; Ангорски заек; Бамбукова вискоза/изкуствена коприна; Смеси; Кашмир; Памук; Лен; Коноп; Лен; Лама; Мохер; Коприна; Синтетика (акрил/полиестер); Синтетични влакна; Вълна; Як; Друго
ro-RO: Tip de fibră compatibil: Alpaca; Angora; Iepure de Angora; Vâscoză din bambus/rayon; Amestecuri; Cașmir; Bumbac; In/Linen; Cânepă; In/flax; Lamă; Mohair; Mătase; Sintetic (acrilic/poliester); Fibre sintetice; Lână; Iac; Altele
ko: 호환 섬유 종류: 알파카; 앙고라; 앙고라 토끼; 대나무 비스코스/레이온; 혼방; 캐시미어; 면; 아마/리넨; 헴프; 리넨/아마; 라마; 모헤어; 실크; 합성섬유(아크릴/폴리에스테르); 합성 섬유; 양모; 야크; 기타
zh-TW: 相容纖維類型: 羊駝毛; 安哥拉羊毛; 安哥拉兔毛; 竹嫘縈/人造絲; 混紡; 喀什米爾羊毛; 棉; 亞麻; 大麻纖維; 亞麻; 駱馬毛; 馬海毛; 絲綢; 合成纖維 (壓克力/聚酯纖維); 合成纖維; 羊毛; 氂牛毛; 其他